Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.200

Finding—Purpose—Intent.

The legislature finds that the traditional process of awarding public works contracts in lump sum to the lowest responsible bidder is a fair and objective method of selecting a contractor. However, under certain circumstances, alternative public works contracting procedures may best serve the public interest if such procedures are implemented in an open and fair process based on objective and equitable criteria. In addition, alternative public works contracting can provide increased access to contracting opportunities for small, minority, women, and veteran-owned businesses. The purpose of this chapter is to authorize the use of certain supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures, to prescribe appropriate requirements to ensure that such contracting procedures serve the public interest and advance contracting opportunities for small, minority, women, and veteran-owned businesses to the extent permitted by law, and to establish a process for evaluation of such contracting procedures. It is the intent of the legislature to establish that, unless otherwise specifically provided for in law, public bodies may use only those alternative public works contracting procedures specifically authorized in this chapter, subject to the requirements of this chapter. It is also the intent of the legislature that inclusion plans required by this chapter may include, with public body approval and to the extent permitted by law, features to improve access to opportunities, including outreach and mentorship, capital including, modified payment provisions, training, and other features intended to maximize the participation and success of small, minority, women, and veteran-owned businesses.

[ 2023 c 395 s 4; 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 2; 2007 c 494 s 1; 1994 c 132 s 1. Formerly RCW 39.10.010.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2023 c 395 ss 1-30, 32-34, 36, and 37: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Findings—Intent—2023 c 395: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 21: "The establishment of alternative public works contracting procedures authorized for use by public bodies has been a complex, controversial, and challenging undertaking, but it has been successful. The key to the successful adoption and consideration of these procedures has depended, in great part, on the review and oversight mechanisms put in place by the legislature in chapter 39.10 RCW, as well as the countless hours of dedicated work by numerous stakeholders over many years. It is the intent of the legislature to clarify that, unless otherwise specifically provided for in law, public bodies that want to use an alternative public works contracting procedure may use only those procedures specifically authorized in chapter 39.10 RCW." [ 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 1.]